Idaho, session 2025, H0191.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 42-1732, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1732. IDAHO WATER RESOURCE BOARD. Pursuant to the provisions of
article 15, section 7, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, there is
hereby established as the constitutional water agency within the department
of water resources the Idaho water resource board which shall consist of
eight (8) appointed members. The eight (8) appointed members shall be quali-
fied electors of the state, no more than four (4) of whom shall be members of
the same political party. Appointment of board members shall be made solely
upon consideration of their knowledge, interest, and active participation
in the field of reclamation, water use, or conservation and no member shall
be appointed a member of the board unless he shall be well informed upon on,
interested in, and engaged actively in the field of reclamation, water use or
conservation of water. Four (4) of these members shall be appointed at large
and no more than three (3) of the eight (8) members shall be residents of a
single district. To insure representation of water users of all geographic
locations of the state, one (1) member shall be appointed from each of the
following districts:
District No. 1 which shall consist of the counties of Boundary, Bonner,
Kootenai, Shoshone, Benewah, Latah, Clearwater, Nez Perce, Lewis and Idaho;
District No. 2 which shall consist of the counties of Adams, Valley,
Washington, Payette, Gem, Boise, Canyon, Ada, Elmore and Owyhee;
District No. 3 which shall consist of the counties of Camas, Gooding,
Jerome, Twin Falls, Cassia, Blaine, Lincoln, Minidoka, Lemhi, Custer and
Butte;
District No. 4 which shall consist of the counties of Clark, Fremont,
Jefferson, Madison, Teton, Bingham, Bonneville, Power, Bannock, Caribou,
Oneida, Franklin and Bear Lake.
All appointments shall be made by the governor with the advice and con-
sent of the senate. As soon as practicable after passage of this act, the
governor shall appoint all eight (8) members; four (4) members shall be ap-
pointed to terms which that will expire on January 1, 1967, four (4) members
shall be appointed to terms which that will expire on January 1, 1969, and
thereafter all appointments shall be to four (4) year terms with a limit of
two (2) terms. Any vacancy caused by death, removal, disqualification, or
resignation, shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term caused by


the vacancy. The appointed members shall be compensated as provided by sec-
tion 59-509(h), Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.